Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Registration of Farm Names

247.380.
Owner of farm may register name of his farm.

Any farm owner may, upon the payment of one dollar ($1) to the Commissioner, have the name of his farm recorded in a register which the Commissioner shall keep for that purpose. The Commissioner shall furnish the owner a certificate, issued under seal, setting forth the name and location of the farm and the name of the owner. When any name has been recorded as the name of any farm in this state, that name shall not be recorded as the name of any other farm.

History.

42b-1.

247.390.
Farm Tenancy Commission. [Repealed.]

247.400.
Compensation of members. [Repealed.]